Florida, session 2026, HB293.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. (1) Within 30 days after this act becomes a
law, the Agency for Health Care Administration shall seek
federal approval through a Medicaid waiver or state plan
amendment as needed to provide coverage of continuous glucose
monitors and related supplies as a durable medical equipment
benefit for Medicaid recipients. A licensed durable medical
equipment provider must be reimbursed for continuous glucose
monitors and related supplies, provided the claim is submitted
through an active Medicare Healthcare Common Procedure Coding
System. The agency may not require such provider to use a
National Drug Code number as part of such claim submission.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb293-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 293 2026
(2) This section does not preclude the agency from
providing additional coverage of continuous glucose monitors as
a Medicaid pharmacy benefit.
(3) The agency shall begin implementation of these changes
upon receiving any necessary federal approval.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb293-00